Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.20, is amended to read: 120B.20 PARENTAL CURRICULUM REVIEW. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General requirements. new text end Each school district deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end have a procedure for a parent, guardian, or an adult student, 18 years of age or older, to review the content of the instructional materials to be provided to a minor child or to an adult student deleted text begin anddeleted text end ,new text begin including reviewing copies of all instructional or program materials, textbooks, printed content, videos, prerecorded materials, and online resources upon request.new text end If deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end parent, guardian, or adult student objects to the content,new text begin the procedure must include a processnew text end to make reasonable arrangements with school personnel for alternative instruction. Alternative instruction may be provided by deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end parent, guardian, or adult student if the alternative instructiondeleted text begin , if any,deleted text end offered by the school board does not meet the concerns of deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end parent, guardian, or adult student. The school board is not required to pay for the costs of alternative instruction provided by a parent, guardian, or adult student. School personnel may not impose an academic or other penalty upon a student merely for arranging alternative instruction under this section. School personnel may evaluate and assess the quality of the student's work. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sexual education curriculum. new text end new text begin A school district must not provide sexual education instruction to a student who is a minor if the student's parent or guardian has not provided written consent to the instruction or program. new text end